Vermont, session 2025-2026, H379.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) Findings.
(1) According to the Vermont Department of Corrections, 20 percent of
the State’s incarcerated population of 851 sentenced offenders are serving life
sentences—151 persons with the possibility of parole and 14 persons serving
life without the possibility parole or a “virtual life sentence” of 50 years or
more.
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 2 of 12
(2) Department of Corrections’ data shows that Vermont’s 20 percent
figure exceeds the national average, in which approximately one in seven
incarcerated persons are serving a life sentence.
(3) The Sentencing Project’s research demonstrates that Vermont’s
offenders subject to a life sentence increased by 11 percent between 2020 and
2024.
(4) According to the U.S. Census Bureau and other sources, the per
capita cost of incarceration in Vermont is $134,218.00.
(5) According to academic research, there are 52 persons with some
form of a life sentence who are 55 years of age or older, carrying an annual
care cost of $6,979,336.00, excluding care costs relating to common chronic
health conditions experienced by this population segment.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to decrease the numbers
of incarcerated persons subject to a life sentence and reduce the costs
incarcerating this population by offering a “second look” at their sentences
through a judicial review by judges that permits granting relief from life
sentences for those persons who are deemed worthy of a reduced sentence.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 7046 is added to read:
§ 7046. SECOND LOOK SENTENCING
(a) Short title. This section may be cited as the “Second Look Sentencing
Act.”
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 3 of 12
(b) Second look. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an
incarcerated person serving a term of imprisonment of at least 15 years who
has served not less than 15 years may petition the sentencing court for a
reduction of the person’s term of imprisonment.
(c) Procedure.
(1) Not more than 90 days after the date on which a person’s 15th year
of imprisonment begins, the Department of Corrections shall provide written
notice of the Second Look Sentencing Act to:
(A) the incarcerated person eligible for a sentence reduction;
(B) the sentencing court;
(C) the prosecutor’s office; and
(D) the Office of the Public Defender.
(2) A petition for a sentence reduction pursuant to this section may be
filed six months after the date on which the 15th year of imprisonment begins.
(3) The petition shall be filed with the sentencing court and may include
affidavits, declarations, letters, correctional records, or any other written or
electronic material relevant to the petition. The petition shall include:
(A) the name of the incarcerated person;
(B) the name of the petitioner, if different than the incarcerated
person, along with a factual statement of:
(i) the petitioner’s relationship to the incarcerated person;
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 4 of 12
(ii) an explanation of why the incarcerated person cannot file the
petition; and
(iii) how the petitioner is acting in the best interests of the
incarcerated person;
(C) any relevant docket number;
(D) any offense for which the qualifying term of imprisonment was
imposed;
(E) any term of imprisonment being served for each docket number;
(F) the date of any offense and any qualifying sentence imposed;
(G) the specific offenses for which the petition is requesting a
reduction in sentence; and
(H) a factual statement detailing how the incarcerated person meets
the eligibility requirements of the Second Look Sentencing Act.
(4) A petition filed pursuant to this section shall be assigned to the judge
who imposed the original sentence upon the incarcerated person, if available,
unless the petitioner requests otherwise.
(5) If the court determines that the facts stated in the petition are
insufficient, the court may provide an opportunity to amend the petition when
justice so requires. The court may also issue an order denying the petition and
notify the petitioner and the incarcerated person, if different than the petitioner.
A denial shall be considered an appealable final order.
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 5 of 12
(6) The court shall provide the prosecutor with a copy of the petition and
any accompanying exhibits.
(7)(A) An incarcerated person or petitioner shall not waive the right to
petition the court under the Second Look Sentencing Act nor shall a prosecutor
request a waiver of the right to petition.
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, an
otherwise eligible incarcerated person or petitioner shall be eligible to file a
petition upon consent of the prosecutor.
(C) Neither statutory mandatory minimums nor fully executed plea
agreements shall preclude an incarcerated person or petitioner from seeking
relief under this section.
(8) If the court determines that the facts stated in the petition establish
eligibility for resentencing under this section, the court shall set a sentencing
hearing:
(A) Within 45 days after the date the petition is filed with the court,
unless the court finds good cause to hold the hearing at a later date or at the
request of the petitioner, if:
(i) The incarcerated individual has one or more medical conditions
leading to major limitations in activities of daily living, including but not
limited to serious mental illness or an intellectual or developmental disability.
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 6 of 12
(ii) The incarcerated individual has one or more medical
conditions that make the individual more likely to contract an illness or disease
while incarcerated that could lead to death or cause the person to develop a
medical condition that prevents the performance of one or more activities of
daily living without assistance. Such conditions include:
(I) any condition related to a weakened immune system,
including human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or acquired immune
deficiency syndrome (AIDS);
(II) debilitating health conditions that occur as a result of
dementia, Alzheimer's disease, or similar degenerative brain disorders;
(III) cardiovascular disease;
(IV) chronic lung disease or asthma;
(V) diabetes;
(VI) hepatitis C;
(VII) seizure disorders;
(VIII) the need for life-sustaining care, such as
feeding tubes or colostomy bags;
(IX) disabling neurological disorders such as multiple
sclerosis (MS) or amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS); or
(X) any condition that requires or is expected to require
specialty care or recurrent hospitalizations.
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 7 of 12
(iii) The petition is filed by the prosecutor.
(B) Within 90 days after the date the petition is filed with the court,
unless the court finds good cause to hold the hearing at a later date or at the
request of the petitioner, if the petition does not meet the criteria set forth
under this section and the incarcerated individual has served not less than 25
years of the petitioner’s sentence and the incarcerated individual is not less
than 60 years of age.
(C) Within 180 days after the date the petition is filed with the court,
unless the court finds good cause to hold the hearing at a later date, if the
petition does not meet the criteria set forth under this section.
(d) Hearing.
(1) Upon request of the petitioner or the prosecutor, the court shall hold
a hearing on the petition where the parties shall be given an opportunity to
present an argument in support of, or against, the petition.
(2) At its discretion, the court may permit parties to present evidence
that the court deems relevant to the petition, including testimony, affidavits,
sworn statements, documents, tangible objects, or any other evidence or
information relevant to the petition.
(e) Orders.
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 8 of 12
(1) After a hearing on the petition, the court shall issue an order
detailing its decision to either grant or deny the petition. In making its
determination, the court shall consider the following factors:
(A) the age of the petitioner at the time of the offense and relevant
research regarding development of youth brain;
(B) the age of the petitioner at the time of the hearing and relevant
research regarding the decline in criminal behavior as individuals age;
(C) the nature of the offense, including changing societal attitudes
regarding the propriety of criminalizing the offense and the appropriate
sentence for the offense;
(D) the circumstances of the offense, including the petitioner’s role in
its commission, whether the petitioner was under the influence of another, or
whether the petitioner was the victim of domestic or sexual abuse at the time of
the offense, and whether the domestic or sexual abuse was related to the
petitioner’s participation in the offense and related conduct;
(E) the history and characteristics of the petitioner at the time of the
hearing, including rehabilitation demonstrated by the petitioner, the
petitioner’s institutional disciplinary record, and the petitioner’s participation
in educational, therapeutic, and vocational opportunities while incarcerated;
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 9 of 12
(F) medical records and reports from physical, mental, or psychiatric
examinations of the petitioner conducted by any licensed health care
professional;
(G) statements and impact statements provided by any victim or
family member of any victim affected by the offense for which the petitioner is
incarcerated;
(H) any evidence concerning whether the petitioner’s original
sentence was enhanced because a petitioner exercised the petitioner’s right to a
trial;
(I) any evidence that the petitioner was denied effective assistance of
counsel at any stage of the case leading to the original sentence, including
ineffective assistance of counsel at the plea negotiation stage; and
(J) any other evidence that the court deems relevant.
(2) If the court grants a petition for a reduction in sentence pursuant to
this section, the incarcerated person or petitioner shall not file a successive
petition until not less than five years have elapsed after the date the petition
was granted.
(3)(A) If the court denies a petition filed pursuant to this section, the
incarcerated person or petitioner shall not file a petition until not less than two
years have elapsed after the date the petition was denied. The court, in its
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 10 of 12
discretion, may require a longer waiting period, but in no event shall the
waiting period exceed five years after the date the petition was denied.
(B) An incarcerated person or petitioner whose petition is denied
shall only have a petition denied once for a period of not less than two years
but not more than five years after the initial petition was denied.
(4) If the court denies a petition filed pursuant to this section, the court
shall make specific findings explaining the denial and shall set specific criteria
for the incarcerated person or petition to meet prior to the filing of another
petition.
(f) Victim’s rights.
(1) Upon the filing and notice of any petition pursuant to this section,
the prosecutor shall notify the victim or victim’s family and provide a copy of
the petition and any accompanying exhibits.
(2) The prosecutor shall, if practicable, consult with victims of a person
convicted of homicide prior to responding to any petition filed or consenting to
the petition of an otherwise eligible petitioner.
(3) The victim of the victim’s family shall have a right to be present at
any hearing held pursuant to this section and shall be permitted to provide
written or oral statements concerning the impact of the offense and any
position as to whether the petition should be granted.
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 11 of 12
(4) Any order granting a petition that modifies the petitioner’s sentence
shall not affect underlying order of restitution.
(g) Habeas corpus and other remedies.
(1) This section shall not be construed as abridging or modifying any
existing remedy available to incarcerated persons eligible to file a petition
pursuant to this section, including a habeas corpus claim, statutory or post-
conviction relief, or any other legal framework.
(2) A petition filed pursuant to this section shall not impact or be
impacted by any pending habeas corpus petition or other post-conviction relief,
nor shall denial of a petition under this section preclude such remedies being
granted.
Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; SAVINGS;
REINVESTMENT; REPORT; RECOMMENDATIONS
Annually, on or before July 1, the Department of Corrections shall submit a
written report to the Joint Legislative Justice Oversight Committee detailing
any savings to the Department as a result of the Second Look Sentencing Act
with recommendations to fund any specific:
(1) victim support services;
(2) correctional facility- and community-based programs to address
recidivism through:
(A) educational opportunities;
VT LEG #381125 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.379
2025 Page 12 of 12
(B) therapeutic intervention;
(C) familial and social supports; and
(D) restorative justice approaches;
(3) reentry and community reintegration initiatives; and
(4) personnel within the Office of the Attorney General, the Office of
the Defender General, or the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs to
represent and support the parties involved in any proceeding under the Second
Look Sentencing Act.
Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 2 of this act shall apply to sentences
imposed prior to the effective date of this act.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381125 v.1